Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 23.
CORPORATIONS AND

PARTNERSHIPS

Chapter

414 Hawaii Business Corporation Act

414D Hawaii Nonprofit Corporations Act

414E Control Share Acquisitions

415 Hawaii Business Corporation Act--Repealed

415A Professional Corporation Act

415B Hawaii Nonprofit Corporation Act--Repealed

416 Corporations, Generally--Repealed

417 Consolidation and Merger of
Corporations--Repealed

417E Corporate Take-Overs

418 Foreign Corporations--Repealed

419 Corporations Sole for Ecclesiastical Purposes

420 Business Development Corporations--Repealed

420D Sustainable Business Corporations

421 Agricultural Cooperative Associations

421C Consumer Cooperative Associations

421G Limited-Equity Housing Cooperatives--Repealed

421H Limited-Equity Housing Cooperatives

421I Cooperative Housing Corporations

421J Planned Community Associations

422 Fish Marketing Associations--Repealed

423 Dental Service Corporations

424 Optometric Service Corporations

425 Partnerships

425D Uniform Limited Partnership Act--Repealed

425E Uniform Limited Partnership Act

425R Registered Agents Act

CHAPTER
414

HAWAII
BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

414-1 Short title

414-2 Reservation of power to amend or repeal

414-3 Definitions

414-4 Notice

414-5 Number of shareholders

414-6 Department director; powers

Part II. Filing Documents

414-11 Filing requirements

414-12 Forms

414-13 Filing, service, and copying fees

414-14 Effective time and date of document

414-15 Correcting filed document

414-16 Filing duty of department director

414-17 Appeal from department director's refusal
to file

document

414-18 Evidentiary effect of copy of filed
document

414-19 Certificates and certified copies to be
received in

evidence

414-20 Penalty for signing false document

Part III. Incorporation

414-31 Incorporators

414-32 Articles of incorporation

414-33 Incorporation

414-34 Liability for pre-incorporation
transactions

414-35 Organization of corporation

414-36 Bylaws

414-37 Emergency bylaws

Part IV. Purposes and Powers

414-41 Purposes

414-42 General powers

414-43 Emergency powers

414-44 Ultra vires

Part V. Name

414-51 Corporate name

414-52 Reserved name

414-53 Administrative order of abatement for
infringement of

corporate name

Part VI. Office and Agent

414-61 Registered agent

414-62 Designation or change of registered agent

414-63 Resignation of registered agent

414-64 Service on corporation

Part VII. Shares and Distributions

A. Shares

414-71 Authorized shares

414-72 Terms of class or series determined by
board of

directors

414-73 Issued and outstanding shares

414-74 Fractional shares

B. Issuance of Shares

414-81 Subscription for shares before
incorporation

414-82 Issuance of shares

414-83 Liability of shareholders

414-84 Share dividends

414-85 Share options

414-86 Form and content of certificates

414-87 Shares without certificates

414-88 Restriction on transfer of shares and
other securities

414-89 Expense of issue

C. Subsequent Acquisition of Shares by
Shareholders and

Corporation

414-101 Shareholders' preemptive rights

414-102 Corporation's acquisition of its own
shares

D. Distributions

414-111 Distributions to shareholders

Part VIII. Shareholders

A. Meetings

414-121 Annual meeting

414-122 Special meeting

414-123 Court-ordered meeting

414-124 Action without meeting

414-125 Notice of meeting

414-126 Waiver of notice

414-127 Record date

B. Voting

414-141 Shareholders' list for meeting

414-142 Voting entitlement of shares

414-143 Proxies

414-144 Shares held by nominees

414-145 Corporation's acceptance of votes, etc.

414-146 Quorum and voting requirements for voting
groups

414-147 Action by single and multiple voting
groups

414-148 Greater quorum or voting requirements

414-149 Voting for directors; cumulative voting

C. Voting Trusts and Agreements

414-161 Voting trusts

414-162 Voting agreements

414-163 Shareholder agreements

D. Derivative Proceedings

414-171 Definitions

414-172 Standing

414-173 Demand

414-174 Stay of proceedings

414-175 Dismissal

414-176 Discontinuance or settlement

414-177 Payment of expenses

414-178 Applicability to foreign corporations

Part IX. Directors and Officers

A. Board of Directors

414-191 Requirement for and duties of board of
directors

414-192 Qualifications of directors

414-193 Number and election of directors

414-194 Election of directors by certain classes
of

shareholders

414-195 Terms of directors generally

414-196 Staggered terms for directors

414-197 Resignation of directors

414-198 Removal of directors by shareholders

414-199 Removal of directors by judicial
proceeding

414-200 Vacancy on board

414-201 Compensation of directors

B. Meetings and Action of the Board

414-211 Meetings

414-212 Action without meeting

414-213 Notice of meeting

414-214 Waiver of notice of meeting

414-215 Quorum and voting

414-216 Committees

C. Standards of Conduct

414-221 General standards for directors

414-222 Limitation of liability of directors;
shareholder

approval required

414-223 Liability for unlawful distributions

D. Officers

414-231 Required officers

414-232 Duties of officers

414-233 Standards of conduct for officers

414-234 Resignation and removal of officers

414-235 Contract rights of officers

E. Indemnification

414-241 Definitions

414-242 Permissible indemnification

414-243 Mandatory indemnification

414-244 Advance for expenses

414-245 Court-ordered indemnification and advance
for expenses

414-246 Determination and authorization of
indemnification

414-247 Officers

414-248 Insurance

414-249 Variation by corporate action; application
of subpart

414-250 Nonexclusivity of subpart

F. Directors' Conflicting Interest
Transactions

414-261 Definitions

414-262 Judicial action

414-263 Directors' action

414-264 Shareholders' action

Part X. Conversions

414-271 Conversion into and from corporations

414-272 Articles of conversion

414-273 Repealed

414-274 Effect of conversion

Part XI. Amendment of Articles of
Incorporation

and Bylaws

A. Amendment of Articles of Incorporation

414-281 Authority to amend

414-282 Amendment by board of directors

414-283 Amendment by board of directors and
shareholders

414-284 Voting on amendments by voting groups

414-285 Amendment before issuance of shares

414-286 Articles of amendment

414-287 Restated or amended and restated articles
of

incorporation

414-288 Amendment pursuant to reorganization

414-289 Effect of amendment

B. Amendment of Bylaws

414-301 Amendment by board of directors or
shareholders

414-302 Bylaw increasing quorum or voting
requirement for

shareholders

414-303 Bylaw increasing quorum or voting
requirement for

directors

Part XII. Merger and Share Exchange

414-310 Definitions

414-311 Merger

414-311.6 Foreign mergers

414-312 Share exchange

414-313 Action plan

414-314 Merger of subsidiary

414-315 Articles of merger or share exchange

414-316 Effect of merger or share exchange

414-317 Repealed

414-318 Merger of subsidiary corporations

414-319 Repealed

Part XIII. Sale of Assets

414-331 Sale of assets in regular course of
business and

mortgage of assets

414-332 Sale of assets other than in regular
course of business

Part XIV. Dissenters' Rights

A. Right to Dissent and Obtain Payment for
Shares

414-341 Definitions

414-342 Right to dissent

414-343 Dissent by nominees and beneficial owners

B. Procedure for Exercise of Dissenters'
Rights

414-351 Notice of dissenters' rights

414-352 Notice of intent to demand payment

414-353 Dissenters' notice

414-354 Duty to demand payment

414-355 Share restrictions

414-356 Payment

414-357 Failure to take action

414-358 After-acquired shares

414-359 Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with
payment or

offer

C. Judicial Appraisal of Shares

414-371 Court action

414-372 Court costs and counsel fees

Part XV. Dissolution

A. Voluntary Dissolution

414-381 Dissolution by incorporators or initial
directors

414-382 Dissolution by board of directors and
shareholders

414-383 Articles of dissolution

414-384 Revocation of dissolution

414-385 Effect of dissolution

414-386 Known claims against dissolved corporation

414-387 Unknown claims against dissolved
corporation

B. Administrative Dissolution

414-401 Grounds for administrative dissolution

414-402 Procedure for and effect of administrative
dissolution

and effect of expiration

414-403 Reinstatement following administrative dissolution

414-404 Appeal from denial of reinstatement

C. Judicial Dissolution

414-411 Grounds for judicial dissolution

414-412 Procedure for judicial dissolution

414-413 Receivership or custodianship

414-414 Decree of dissolution

414-415 Election to purchase in lieu of
dissolution

D. Miscellaneous

414-421 Deposit with director of finance

414-422 Trustees or receivers for dissolved
corporations;

appointment; powers; duties

Part XVI. Foreign Corporations

A. Certificate of Authority

414-431 Authority to transact business required

414-432 Consequences of transacting business
without authority

414-433 Application for certificate of authority

414-434 Change of name by foreign corporation

414-435 Effect of certificate of authority

414-436 Corporate name of foreign corporation

414-437 Registered agent of foreign corporation

414-438 Change of registered agent of foreign
corporation

414-439 Resignation of registered agent of foreign
corporation

414-440 Service on foreign corporation

414-441 Application to corporations heretofore
authorized to

transact business in this State

B. Withdrawal

414-451 Withdrawal of foreign corporation

C. Revocation of Certificate of Authority

414-461 Grounds for revocation

414-462 Procedure for and effect of revocation

414-463 Appeal from revocation

Part XVII. Records and Reports

A. Records

414-470 Books and records

B. Reports

414-472 Annual report

414-473 Penalties imposed upon corporations

Part XVIII. Transition Provisions

414-481 Application to existing domestic
corporations

414-482 Application to qualified foreign
corporations

414-483 Savings provision

414-484 Severability

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2001, c 129, §2.

Cross References

Sustainable business corporations, see chapter 420D.

Law Journals and Reviews

The "Aloha Corporation:" Infusing the Culture of
Hawai‘i to Broaden the Perspective of Business and Return to Community. 34 UH
L. Rev. 221 (2012).

DERIVATION
TABLE OF CHAPTER 414 FROM

MODEL
BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

MBCA

HRS (3rd edition)

414-1 1.01

414-2 1.02

414-3 1.40

414-4 1.41

414-5 1.42

414-6

414-11 1.20

414-12 1.21

414-13

414-14 1.23

414-15 1.24

414-16 1.25

414-17 1.26

414-18 1.27

414-19

414-20

414-31 2.01

414-32 2.02

414-33 2.03

414-34 2.04

414-35 2.05

414-36 2.06

414-37 2.07

414-41 3.01

414-42 3.02

414-43 3.03

414-44 3.04

414-51 4.01

414-52 4.02

414-53

414-61 5.01

414-62 5.02

414-63 5.03

414-64

414-71 6.01

414-72 6.02

414-73 6.03

414-74 6.04

414-81 6.20

414-82 6.21

414-83 6.22

414-84 6.23

414-85 6.24

414-86 6.25

414-87 6.26

414-88 6.27

414-89 6.28

414-101 6.30

414-102 6.31

414-111 6.40

414-121 7.01

414-122 7.02

414-123 7.03

414-124 7.04

414-125 7.05

414-126 7.06

414-127 7.07

414-141 7.20

414-142 7.21

414-143 7.22

414-144 7.23

414-145 7.24

414-146 7.25

414-147 7.26

414-148 7.27

414-149 7.28

414-161 7.30

414-162 7.31

414-163 7.32

414-171 7.40

414-172 7.41

414-173 7.42

414-174 7.43

414-175 7.44

414-176 7.45

414-177 7.46

414-178 7.47

414-191 8.01

414-192 8.02

414-193 8.03

414-194 8.04

414-195 8.05

414-196 8.06

414-197 8.07

414-198 8.08

414-199 8.09

414-200 8.10

414-201 8.11

414-211 8.20

414-212 8.21

414-213 8.22

414-214 8.23

414-215 8.24

414-216 8.25

414-221 8.30

414-222

414-223 8.33

414-231 8.40

414-232 8.41

414-233 8.42

414-234 8.43

414-235 8.44

414-241 8.50

414-242 8.51

414-243 8.52

414-244 8.53

414-245 8.54

414-246 8.55

414-247 8.56

414-248 8.57

414-249 8.58

414-250

414-261 8.60

414-262 8.61

414-263 8.62

414-264 8.63

414-271

414-272

414-273

414-274

414-281 10.01

414-282 10.02

414-283 10.03

414-284 10.04

414-285 10.05

414-286 10.06

414-287 10.07

414-288 10.08

414-289 10.09

414-301 10.20

414-302 10.21

414-303 10.22

414-311 11.01

414-312 11.02

414-313 11.03

414-314 11.04

414-315 11.05

414-316 11.06

414-317 11.07

414-318

414-319

414-331 12.01

414-332 12.02

414-341 13.01

414-342 13.02

414-343 13.03

414-351 13.20

414-352 13.21

414-353 13.22

414-354 13.23

414-355 13.24

414-356 13.25

414-357 13.26

414-358 13.27

414-359 13.28

414-371 13.30

414-372 13.31

414-381 14.01

414-382 14.02

414-383 14.03

414-384 14.04

414-385 14.05

414-386 14.06

414-387 14.07

414-401 14.20

414-402 14.21

414-403 14.22

414-404 14.23

414-411 14.30

414-412 14.31

414-413 14.32

414-414 14.33

414-415 14.34

414-421 14.40

414-431 15.01

414-432 15.02

414-433 15.03

414-434

414-435 15.05

414-436 15.06

414-437 15.07

414-438 15.08

414-439 15.09

414-440 15.10

414-441

414-451 15.20

414-461 15.30

414-462 15.31

414-463 15.32

414-470

414-472 16.22

414-473

414-481 17.01

414-482 17.02

414-483 17.03

414-484 17.04

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next